Hawaii, session 2026, SB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in 2022, the median price of a single-family home in the State was $985,000 and the median price of a condominium in the State was $490,000.  Furthermore, the cost of single-family home construction in 2022 ranged from $280 per square foot to $535 per square foot.  For multi-family homes such as apartment buildings and condominiums, the cost of construction ranged from $255 per square foot to $430 per square foot. The legislature further finds that building codes and standards passed by the International Code Council add to the cost of housing construction and reduce affordability. In its process to determine whether to adopt international standards, the state building code council should assess the financial impact of changes to construction costs, and the impact on amortized utility costs for single-family and multi-family dwellings across the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the state building code council to: (1)  Consider the impact of building code standards on the cost of single-family and multi-family homes built in the State, including the impact on amortized utility costs for single-family and multi-family homes; and (2)  Include a financial impact assessment on each code and standard adopted by the state building code council in its annual report submitted to the governor. SECTION 2.  Section 107-24, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§107-24  Authority and duties of the council.  (a)  Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the council shall establish the Hawaii state building codes. (b)  The council shall appoint a subcommittee comprising the four council members representing county building officials, whose duty shall be to recommend any necessary or desirable state amendments to the codes and standards identified in section 107-25.  Any recommended state amendments shall require the unanimous agreement of the subcommittee. (c) The council shall adopt, amend, or update codes and standards identified in section 107-25 on a staggered basis as established by the council; provided that adoption of a code or standard shall be within two years of the official publication date of the code or standard, pursuant to chapter 92, and exempt from the requirements of chapter 91.  If the council does not adopt a code or standard identified in section 107-25 within the two-year time period, that code or standard shall automatically become part of the Hawaii state building code until superseded by the adoption of an amended version of the code or standard by the council pursuant to this subsection. (d)  The council may appoint other investigative, technical expertise committees, which may include council members. (e)  The council shall consult with general building contractor associations and building trade associations to gather information and recommendations on construction practices and training relevant to building codes and standards. (f) When considering the adoption of any code or standard, the council shall consult with building industry trade associations to gather cost data and assess the financial impact that implementing the code or standard is likely to have on the cost of constructing single‑family and multi-family homes in the State.  The council shall also consider the likely impact of the code or standard on amortized utility costs for single-family and multi-family homes. [(f)] (g)  The council may make expenditures for technical references, equipment and supplies, and other operating expenses, and may contract for the conduct of research studies and other technical services. [(g)] (h)  The council may provide education and technical training and administrative assistance in the form of services or grants at the state and county levels relating to the implementation and enforcement of the Hawaii state building codes adopted pursuant to this part. [(h)] (i)  At the end of each fiscal year, the council shall submit a written report to the governor on the council's activities, including the codes and standards adopted, amended, or updated by the council.  The written report shall include an assessment of cost by building industry trade associations on each code and standard adopted by the council, to determine whether the code or standard substantially benefits residents of the State." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________